Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 4. Ventilation, Mine Gases, and Other Hazardous Conditions.
§ 45.2-843.
Line brattice.

Substantially constructed line brattice shall be used from the last open crosscut of an entry or room when necessary to provide adequate ventilation for the miners and to remove gases. Any line brattice that is damaged by a fall or otherwise shall be repaired promptly.

The space between the line brattice and the rib shall be large enough to permit the flow of a sufficient volume of air to keep the working face clear of flammable and noxious gases.

Brattice cloth that is used underground shall be of flame-resistant material.

An accumulation of methane shall be moved only by means of properly installed line brattice or other approved method.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-60.4; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-61; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.226; 1996, c. 774; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-844.
Ventilation with air from certain areas.

Active face workings shall not be ventilated with air that has passed through a worked-out area or has been used to ventilate a pillar line. This section shall not apply to air that is being used to ventilate an active pillar line or a room that is necessary to establish and maintain such pillar line.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-60.5; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-62; 1993, c. 442; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.227; 1996, c. 774; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-845.
Worked-out areas.

Every worked-out area shall be either sealed or ventilated.

Where the practice is to seal worked-out areas, the sealing shall be done in accordance with sealing provisions of the approved bleeder plan.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-60.5; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-62; 1993, c. 442; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.228; 1996, c. 774; 1999, c. 256; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-846.
Air quality.

All active workings shall be ventilated by a current of air containing at least 19.5 percent by volume of oxygen and no harmful amount of any noxious or poisonous gas.

The volume and velocity of the current of air in all active workings shall be sufficient to dilute, render harmless, and carry away flammable, explosive, noxious, and harmful gases, dust, smoke, and explosive fumes.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-60.3; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-63; 1968, c. 310; 1993, c. 442; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.229; 1996, c. 774; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-847.
Examination of mine for explosive gas and other hazardous conditions.

Every certified person whose regular duties require him to inspect working places in any mine for hazardous conditions shall have in his possession and shall use, when underground, a permissible methane detector or other permissible device capable of detecting methane and oxygen deficiency.

A sufficient number of permissible methane detectors or other permissible devices capable of detecting methane shall be kept at each mine inby the last open crosscut. Every miner shall be trained in the operation of such devices. Every miner working inby the last open crosscut shall be certified by the Board of Coal Mining Examiners pursuant to §

45.2-520

to conduct gas testing.

Every methane detector shall be maintained in permissible condition. Every methane detector shall be calibrated at least monthly in accordance with the manufacturer’s recommendations. A record of such calibration shall be made in a book for this purpose kept at a surface location at the mine and maintained for one year.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-32, 45-33, 45-60.4, 45-68.1, 45-69.7, 45-85.6; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-35, 45.1-65; 1978, cc. 118, 120; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.231; 1996, c. 774; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-848.
Tampering with methane monitoring devices prohibited; penalty.

No person shall intentionally disturb, disconnect, bypass, impair, or otherwise tamper with any methane monitor or other device that is capable of detecting the presence of explosive gas and is used in an underground coal mine. If such methane monitor or device is installed on a face cutting machine, a continuous miner, longwall face equipment, a loading machine, or other mechanized equipment used to extract or load coal, as required pursuant to 30 C.F.R. Part 75.342, and such monitor, device, or equipment malfunctions, it may be disconnected or bypassed for the purpose of removing it or the equipment in order to make necessary repairs to it or the equipment. Any methane monitor or device not otherwise required by law may be disconnected, bypassed, or removed.

Violation of this section is a Class 6 felony.

History.

1993, c. 247, § 45.1-65.1; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.232; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-849.
Allowing persons to work in mine where methane monitoring equipment disconnected; penalty.

No operator, agent, or mine foreman shall knowingly permit any miner to work in any area of an underground coal mine where such operator, agent, or mine foreman has knowledge that a methane monitor or other device capable of detecting the presence of explosive gas has been impaired, disturbed, disconnected, or bypassed in violation of §

45.2-848

. Violation of this section is a Class 6 felony.

History.

1993, c. 247, § 45.1-30.1; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.233; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-850.
Intentionally bypassing a safety device; prohibition.

No person shall intentionally bypass, bridge, or otherwise impair an electrical or hydraulic circuit that affects the safe operation of electrical or mechanical equipment.

The provisions of subsection A shall not prohibit (i) a certified electrical repairman from bypassing an energized circuit for troubleshooting; (ii) an authorized person from performing repairs or maintenance on equipment once the power is off and the equipment is blocked against motion, except where motion is necessary to make adjustment or to move the equipment to a safe location; (iii) an authorized person from bypassing a hydraulic circuit for the purpose of troubleshooting or moving equipment to a safe location in order to make necessary repairs or take such equipment out of service; or (iv) an authorized person from activating an override feature that is designed by the machine manufacturer to allow such machine to be moved to a safe location in order to undergo necessary repairs or be taken out of service.

History.

2005, c. 3, § 45.1-161.233:1; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-851.
Control of coal dust.

Coal dust shall not be permitted to accumulate excessively in any part of the active areas, including any active workings that are soon to be worked-out.

Where an underground mining operation creates or raises an excessive amount of coal dust into the air, any coal dust on the ribs, roof, or floor shall undergo an application of water or water with a wetting agent added to it or another effective method, approved by the Chief or his authorized representative, of controlling dust to reduce dispersibility and minimize the risk of explosion. Such application or method shall occur within 40 feet of any active workings or such other area as the Chief or his authorized representative requires.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-77.1; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-66; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.234; 1996, c. 774; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-852.
Rock dusting.

Every underground area of a mine, except an area in which the coal dust is too wet or too high in incombustible content to propagate an explosion, shall be rock-dusted to within 40 feet of every working face, unless such area is inaccessible or unsafe to enter or unless the Chief or his authorized representative permits an exception upon his finding that such exception does not pose a hazard to any miner. Every crosscut that is less than 40 feet from a working face shall also be rock-dusted.

Every other area of a mine shall be rock-dusted if conditions are found by a proper inspection to be so dusty as to constitute a hazard. If such conditions are found to exist, the Chief or his authorized representative shall require the necessary rock dusting to make every such area of the mine safe.

Coal dust, including float coal dust deposited on rock-dusted surfaces, loose coal, and other combustible material, shall be cleaned up and shall not be permitted to accumulate excessively in active workings or on electric equipment therein.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-77; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-67; 1978, c. 120; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.235; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.